Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3991.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PRIVATE SALE OF TAX-FORFEITED LAND; ST. LOUIS COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding the public sale provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 282, or other law to the contrary, St. Louis County may sell by private sale the tax-forfeited land described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The conveyance must be in a form approved by the attorney general. The attorney general may make changes to the land description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land to be sold is located in St. Louis County and is described as: new text end new text begin Government Lot 2, EXCEPT the South 760 feet; AND EXCEPT that part of Government Lot 2, shown as Parcel 75 on Minnesota Department of Transportation Right of Way Plat No. 69-181, Section 18, Township 62 North, Range 20 West. new text end new text begin (d) The county has determined that the county's land management interests would best be served if the land was returned to private ownership to resolve a structure encroachment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin PRIVATE SALE OF LAND; ST. LOUIS COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding the public sale and competitive bidding requirements of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 373, or other law to the contrary, St. Louis County may sell by private sale the county fee-owned lands described in paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) The lands to be sold are located in St. Louis County, Section 34, Township 51 North, Range 18 West, and are described as: new text end new text begin (1) Lots 1, 2, 3, 10, 11, and 12, Block B, including part of the vacated alley adjacent and including part of vacated 3rd Avenue adjacent, Brookston; new text end new text begin (2) Lots 4 thru 9, Block B, including part of the vacated alley adjacent, and including part of 3rd Street S adjacent to Lots 6 and 7, and including part of 3rd Avenue adjacent to Lots 4 thru 6 tool house, Brookston; and new text end new text begin (3) that part of the South Half of the Northeast Quarter lying southerly of the Brookston Plat and westerly of County State-Aid Highway 31. new text end new text begin (c) St. Louis County has determined that the county's interest would best be served if the lands were sold. new text end